Utah statutes.
78B-5-827.   Attorney fees awarded to state funded agency in action against state or subdivision -- Forfeit of appropriated money.

An agency or organization receiving state funds which, as a result of its suing the state, or political subdivision of the state, receives attorney fees and costs as all or part of a settlement or award, shall forfeit to the General Fund, from its appropriated money, an amount equal to the attorney fees received.

